Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2001
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2001 to 38-2071 shall be known and may be cited as the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 659;

Laws 2009, LB394, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB406, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB701, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB29, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB905, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 11;

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 1.
August 1, 2027